New York, session 2025-2026, A10325.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the town of Brookhaven, county of Suffolk, is hereby 3 authorized to accept from Chabad at Stony Brook, Inc. an application for 4 exemption from real property taxes pursuant to section 462 of the real 5 property tax law with respect to the 2024-2025 assessment roll for all 6 of the 2025 general taxes and all of the 2025 school taxes for the 7 parcel owned by such organization located at 1 Scotch Pine Lane, in the 8 hamlet of East Setauket, town of Brookhaven, county of Suffolk, other- 9 wise known as Suffolk county tax map district 0200, section 363.00, 10 block 3.00, lot 001.013. If accepted, the application shall be reviewed 11 as if it had been received on or before the taxable status date estab- 12 lished for such assessment roll. 13 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 14 such exemption if such organization had filed an application for 15 exemption by the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon 16 approval by the Brookhaven town board, may make appropriate correction 17 to the subject roll. If such exemption is granted and such organization, 18 therefore, shall have paid any tax with respect to the subject roll, the 19 applicable governing body or tax department may, in its sole discretion, 20 provide for the refund of those taxes paid and cancel those taxes, 21 fines, penalties, liens or interest remaining unpaid. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14498-01-6